Tennessee, session 114, SB0761.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-101(g)(2)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(B) At the time of the filing of the petition for expunction at least:
(i) Five (5) years have elapsed since the completion of the sentence
imposed for the offense the person is seeking to have expunged, if the offense is
a misdemeanor or Class E felony;
(ii) Eight (8) years have elapsed since the completion of the sentence
imposed for the offense the person is seeking to have expunged, if the offense is
a Class D felony; or
(iii) Ten (10) years have elapsed since the completion of the sentence
imposed for the offense the person is seeking to have expunged, if the offense is
a Class C felony; and
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0761
002441
- 1 -